Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 33.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-653
Act, how cited; brain injury registry; legislative intent.

(1) Sections 81-653 to 81-662 shall be known and may be cited as the Brain Injury Registry Act.

(2) The intent of the Brain Injury Registry Act is to require the establishment and maintenance of a brain injury registry in and for the State of Nebraska.

(3) The purpose of the brain injury registry is to provide a central data bank of accurate, precise, and current information to assist in the statistical identification of persons with brain or head injury, planning for the treatment and rehabilitation of such persons, and the prevention of such injury.

Laws 1992, LB 308, § 1;

Laws 2008, LB928, § 33.